Utah statutes.
41-6a-1009.   Use of roadway by pedestrians -- Prohibited activities.
(1)  Where there is a sidewalk provided and its use is practicable,  a
pedestrian may not walk along or on an adjacent roadway.
(2)  Where a sidewalk is not provided, a pedestrian walking along or on a
highway shall walk only on the shoulder, as far as practicable from the edge
of the roadway.
(3)  Where a sidewalk or a shoulder is not available, a pedestrian walking
along or on a highway shall:
(a)  walk as near as practicable to the outside edge of the roadway; and
(b)  if on a two-way roadway, walk only on the left side of the roadway facing
traffic.
(4)  A person may not sit, stand, or loiter on or near a roadway for the
purpose of soliciting from the occupant of a vehicle:
(a)  a ride;
(b)  contributions;
(c)  employment;
(d)  the parking, watching, or guarding of a vehicle; or
(e)  other business.
(5)  A pedestrian who is under the influence of alcohol or any drug to a
degree which renders the pedestrian a hazard may not walk or be on a highway
except on a sidewalk or sidewalk area.
(6)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a pedestrian on a roadway
shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles on the roadway.
